District of Columbia statutes.
10-1018

Repealed

Security assessments and implementation at District facilities.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 18061
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-358, § 2, 58 DCR 765
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
Section 49 of D.C. Law 19-171 renumbered D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806l as D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806m, after the section’s repeal by D.C. Law 19-21.